Utah statutes.
11-43-102.   Memorials by political subdivisions.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Political subdivision" means any county, city, town, or school district.
(b)  "Political subdivision" does not mean a local district under Title 17B,
Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, or a special
service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.
(2)  A political subdivision may authorize the use or donation of the
political subdivision's land for the purpose of maintaining, erecting, or
contributing to the erection or maintenance of a memorial to commemorate those
individuals who have:
(a)  participated in or have given their lives in any of the one or more wars
or military conflicts in which the United States of America has been a
participant; or
(b)  given their lives in association with public service on behalf of the
state or the political subdivision, including firefighters, peace officers,
highway patrol officers, or other public servants.
(3)  The use or donation of a political subdivision's land in relation to a
memorial described in Subsection (2) may include:
(a)  using or appropriating public funds for the purchase, development,
improvement, or maintenance of public land on which a memorial is located or
established;
(b)  using or appropriating public funds for the erection, improvement, or
maintenance of a memorial;
(c)  donating or selling public land for use in relation to a memorial; or
(d)  authorizing the use of a political subdivision's land for a memorial that
is funded or maintained in part or in full by another public or private
entity.
(4)  The political subdivision may specify the form, placement, and design of
a memorial that is subject to this section.
